Utah statutes.
41-6a-502.   Driving under the influence of alcohol, drugs, or a combination of both or with specified or unsafe blood alcohol concentration -- Reporting of convictions.

(1)  A person may not operate or be in actual physical control of a vehicle within this state if the person:

(a)  has sufficient alcohol in the person's body that a subsequent chemical test shows that the person has a blood or breath alcohol concentration of .08 grams or greater at the time of the test;

(b)  is under the influence of alcohol, any drug, or the combined influence of alcohol and any drug to a degree that renders the person incapable of safely operating a vehicle; or

(c)  has a blood or breath alcohol concentration of .08 grams or greater at the time of operation or actual physical control.

(2)  Alcohol concentration in the blood shall be based upon grams of alcohol per 100 milliliters of blood, and alcohol concentration in the breath shall be based upon grams of alcohol per 210 liters of breath.

(3)  A violation of this section includes a violation under a local ordinance similar to this section adopted in compliance with Section 41-6a-510.

(4)  Beginning on July 1, 2012, a court shall, monthly, send to the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing, created in Section 58-1-103, a report containing the name, case number, and, if known, the date of birth of each person convicted during the preceding month of a violation of this section for whom there is evidence that the person was driving under the influence, in whole or in part, of a prescribed controlled substance.

